Missouri, session 2026, SB1355.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 301, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 301.148, to read as
follows:
301.148. 1. Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, nonapportioned motor vehicles eligible for
registration under this chapter may, at the option of the
registrant, be registered permanently upon the payment of
seven times the applicable fees required to register the
vehicle annually and presentation of all documentation
otherwise required by law to register the vehicle annually.
2. The permanent plate or plates and registration fees
are vehicle specific. The plate or plates and the
registration fees paid are nontransferable and
nonrefundable, except those covered under the provisions of
section 301.442. Upon the transfer of the title to any
vehicle registered in accordance with this section, the
registration shall be cancelled and the license plates
issued therefor shall be returned to the director of revenue.
3. As used in this section, the term "fees" shall
include:

SB 1355 2
(1) Fees for registering the vehicle in accordance
with this chapter;
(2) Emblem-use authorization fees, contributions, or
donations as specified in this chapter for the issuance of
special license plates, which shall be paid to the
organization issuing the emblem use authorization statement
for the plate or plates unless otherwise specified by law;
and
(3) Fees collected as compensation for department of
revenue fee offices under section 136.055, which shall be
paid to the fee office. Fee offices are hereby authorized
to collect a fee as compensation in full and for all
services rendered, on the basis specified in this section.
4. The department of revenue may issue a distinctive
registration tab or tabs indicating a vehicle has been
permanently registered as specified in this section.
5. The department of revenue may promulgate rules as
necessary for the implementation of this section. Any rule
or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in
this section shall become effective only if it complies with
and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and,
if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with
the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to
delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule
are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓